Oklahoma, session 2025, SB142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 289, O.S.L.


2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 18-114.15), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 18-114.15. A. Beginning with the 2023-2024 2025-2026


school year, certified personnel, as defined in Section 26-103 of


Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title, in the public schools


of Oklahoma shall receive in salary and/or fringe benefits not less


than the amounts specified in the following schedule:

Req. No. 272 Page 1


MINIMUM SALARY SCHEDULE


National


Years of Bachelor’s Board Master’s Doctor’s


Experience Degree Certification Degree Degree


$39,601 $40,759 $40,991 $42,381


$42,601 $43,759 $43,991 $45,381


$40,035 $41,193 $41,425 $42,815


$43,035 $44,193 $44,425 $45,815


$40,469 $41,628 $41,859 $43,249


$43,469 $44,628 $44,859 $46,249


$40,904 $42,062 $42,294 $43,684


$43,904 $45,062 $45,294 $46,684


$41,338 $42,496 $42,728 $44,118


$44,338 $45,496 $45,728 $47,118


$42,810 $43,968 $44,200 $45,590


$45,810 $46,968 $47,200 $48,590


$43,273 $44,432 $44,663 $46,054


$46,273 $47,432 $47,663 $49,054


$43,737 $44,895 $45,127 $46,517


$46,737 $47,895 $48,127 $49,517


$44,200 $45,358 $45,590 $46,980


$47,200 $48,358 $48,590 $49,980


$44,663 $45,822 $46,054 $47,444


$47,663 $48,822 $49,054 $50,444

Req. No. 272 Page 2


$46,684 $47,844 $48,568 $50,945


$49,684 $50,844 $51,568 $53,945


$47,177 $48,336 $49,061 $51,438


$50,177 $51,336 $52,061 $54,438


$47,670 $48,829 $49,554 $51,931


$50,670 $51,829 $52,554 $54,931


$48,162 $49,322 $50,047 $52,424


$51,162 $52,322 $53,047 $55,424


$48,655 $49,815 $50,539 $52,916


$51,655 $52,815 $53,539 $55,916


$50,167 $51,327 $52,052 $54,430


$53,167 $54,327 $55,052 $57,430


$50,660 $51,820 $52,545 $54,923


$53,660 $54,820 $55,545 $57,923


$51,153 $52,313 $53,038 $55,416


$54,153 $55,313 $56,038 $58,416


$51,646 $52,806 $53,531 $55,909


$54,646 $55,806 $56,531 $58,909


$52,139 $53,299 $54,024 $56,402


$55,139 $56,299 $57,024 $59,402


$52,652 $53,813 $54,538 $56,917


$55,652 $56,813 $57,538 $59,917


$53,145 $54,306 $55,031 $57,410


$56,145 $57,306 $58,031 $60,410

Req. No. 272 Page 3


$53,639 $54,799 $55,524 $57,903


$56,639 $57,799 $58,524 $60,903


$54,132 $55,292 $56,018 $58,397


$57,132 $58,292 $59,018 $61,397


$54,625 $55,785 $56,511 $58,890


$57,625 $58,785 $59,511 $61,890


$56,049 $57,232 $57,971 $60,395


$59,049 $60,232 $60,971 $63,395


Master’s Degree +


Years of National Board


Experience Certification


$42,149


$45,149


$42,583


$45,583


$43,018


$46,018


$43,452


$46,452


$43,886


$46,886


$45,358


$48,358


$45,822

Req. No. 272 Page 4


$48,822


$46,285


$49,285


$46,749


$49,749


$47,212


$50,212


$49,728


$52,728


$50,221


$53,221


$50,713


$53,713


$51,206


$54,206


$51,699


$54,699


$53,212


$56,212


$53,705


$56,705


$54,198


$57,198


$54,691

Req. No. 272 Page 5


$57,691


$55,184


$58,184


$55,698


$58,698


$56,192


$59,192


$56,685


$59,685


$57,178


$60,178


$57,671


$60,671


$59,153


$62,153


B. 1. When determining the Minimum Salary Schedule minimum


salary schedule, “fringe benefits” shall mean all or part of


retirement benefits, excluding the contributions made pursuant to


subsection A of Section 17-108.1 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title and the flexible benefit allowance pursuant to


Section 26-105 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title from


the flexible benefit allowance funds disbursed by the State Board of


Education and the State Board of Career and Technology Education



Req. No. 272 Page 6


pursuant to Section 26-104 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this


title.


2. If a school district intends to provide retirement benefits


to a teacher such that the teacher’s salary would be less than the


amounts set forth in the minimum salary schedule specified in


subsection A of this section, the district shall be required to


provide written notification to the teacher prior to his or her


employment or, if already employed by the district, no later than


thirty (30) days prior to the date the district elects to provide


retirement benefits such that the teacher’s salary would be less


than the minimum salary schedule.


C. Any of the degrees referred to in this section shall be from


a college recognized by the State Board of Education. The Board


shall accept teaching experience from out-of-state school districts


that are accredited by the State Board of Education or appropriate


state accrediting agency for the districts. The Board shall accept


teaching experience from out-of-country schools that are accredited


or otherwise endorsed by the appropriate national or regional


accrediting or endorsement authority. Out-of-country certification


documentation in a language other than English shall be analyzed by


an educational credential evaluation service in accordance with


industry standards and guidelines and approved by the State


Department of Education. The person seeking to have credit granted


for out-of-country teaching experience shall be responsible for all

Req. No. 272 Page 7


costs of the analysis by a credential evaluation service. The Board


shall accept teaching experience from primary and secondary schools


that are operated by the United States Department of Defense or are


affiliated with the United States Department of State.


D. For the purpose of state salary increments and retirement,


no teacher shall be granted credit for more than five (5) years of


active duty in the military service or out-of-state or out-of-


country teaching experience as a certified teacher or its


equivalent. Nothing in this section shall prohibit boards of


education from crediting more years of experience on district salary


schedules than those allowed for state purposes.


E. The State Board of Education shall recognize, for purposes


of certification and salary increments, all the years of experience


of a:


1. Certified teacher who teaches in the educational program of


the Department of Corrections, beginning with fiscal year 1981;


2. Vocational rehabilitation counselor under the Department of


Human Services if the counselor was employed as a certified teacher


by the State Department of Education when the Division of Vocational


Rehabilitation was transferred from the State Board of Career and


Technology Education or the State Board of Education to the Oklahoma


Public Welfare Commission on July 1, 1968;


3. Vocational rehabilitation counselor which were completed


while employed by the Department of Human Services if such counselor

Req. No. 272 Page 8


was certified as a teacher or was eligible for certification as a


teacher in Oklahoma;


4. Certified teacher which were completed while employed by the


Child Study Center located at University Hospital, if the teacher


was certified as a teacher in Oklahoma; and


5. Certified school psychologist or psychometrist which were


completed while employed as a doctoral intern, psychological


assistant, or psychologist with any agency of the State of Oklahoma


if the experience primarily involved work with persons of school- or


preschool-age and if the person was, at the time the experience was


acquired, certified as, or eligible for certification as, a school


psychologist or psychometrist.


F. The provisions of this section shall not apply to teachers


who have entered into postretirement employment with a public school


in Oklahoma and are still receiving a monthly retirement benefit.


G. If a person employed as certified personnel, as defined in


Section 26-103 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title, by a


school district during the 2022-2023 2024-2025 school year was


receiving a salary above the step level indicated by the State


Minimum Salary Schedule state minimum salary schedule for the 2022-


2023 2024-2025 school year, the person shall receive a salary


increase amount equal to the amount indicated in subsection A of


this section for the step level indicated for the person, provided



Req. No. 272 Page 9


they remain employed by the same district, unless the hours or the


duties of the certified personnel are reduced proportionately.


H. If a school district does not receive Foundation or Salary


Incentive Aid pursuant to Section 18-200.1 of Title 70 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, funds shall be allocated by the State Board of


Education to implement the salary increases indicated in subsection


A of this section.


I. Persons employed as classroom instructional employees of


technology center school districts supervised by the State Board of


Career and Technology Education shall receive a salary increase


amount equal to the amount indicated in subsection A of this section


for the step level indicated for the person, provided they remain


employed by the same technology center school district, unless the


hours or the duties of the classroom instructional employees are


reduced proportionately.


J. Persons employed as correctional teachers or vocational


instructors by the Department of Corrections pursuant to Section


510.6a of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes or persons employed as


teachers by the Office of Juvenile Affairs shall receive a salary


increase amount equal to the amount indicated in subsection A of


this section for the step level indicated for the person, provided


they remain employed by the same Department of Corrections or Office


of Juvenile Affairs facility, unless the hours or the duties of the



Req. No. 272 Page 10


correctional teachers, vocational instructors, or teachers are


reduced proportionately.


K. Persons employed as teachers by the State Department of


Rehabilitation Services shall receive a salary increase amount equal


to the amount indicated in subsection A of this section for the step


level indicated for the person, provided they remain employed by the


State Department of Rehabilitation Services, unless the hours or the


duties of the teachers are reduced proportionately.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-272 LG 12/30/2024 9:40:33 AM



















Req. No. 272 Page 11